Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-508
Sale of gas; units of measurement.

It shall be unlawful to sell at retail or wholesale or offer for sale at retail or wholesale any liquefied petroleum gas except specified in pounds; liquid measure, specified in gallons; or vapor, specified in cubic feet or such other units as may be approved by the Department of Agriculture.

Laws 1957, c. 240, § 1, p. 801.